Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3702
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Dialysis Patient Care Technician Registration Act is to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the public by providing for the accurate, cost-effective, efficient, and safe utilization of dialysis patient care technicians in the administration of hemodialysis. The act applies to dialysis facilities in which hemodialysis is provided.

Laws 2017, LB255, § 2.